California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4741.

An adult person with a developmental disability has the legal right to determine where his or her residence will be. Except in a situation which presents immediate danger to the health and well-being of the individual, the regional center or its designee shall not remove a consumer from a residential care facility against the client’s wishes unless there has been specific court action to abridge such right with respect to an adult or unless the parent, guardian or conservator consents with respect to a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4742.

The regional center or its designated representative shall (a) guide and counsel facility staff regarding the care and services and supports required by each consumer served by the regional center; and (b) monitor the care and services and supports provided the individual to ensure that care and services and supports are provided in accordance with the individual program plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4742.1.

(a) A statement made by a regional center representative when discharging his or her obligation to monitor the provision of services and supports pursuant to this division shall be a privileged communication, subject to subdivision (b).

(b) A statement shall not be privileged pursuant to subdivision (a) if a party to a judicial action demonstrates that the regional center representative made the disputed statement with knowledge of its falsity or with reckless disregard for the truth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4743.

It is the intent of the Legislature that to the greatest extent possible, the staff of the regional center or its designee are assigned so as to minimize the number of persons responsible for programs provided in a given facility. 

The regional center or its designee shall designate the staff person responsible for assuring that each individual consumer’s program plan is carried out. One person shall be assigned by the regional center as the principal liaison to a facility and to monitor the provision of care and the services provided by that facility in accordance with the individual program plans. If, due to the number of regional center consumers in the facility, additional staff of a regional center or its designee serve consumers in the facility, one person shall be assigned as having primary responsibility for, and assure consistency and continuity of, directions to the administrator and for the monitoring of care and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4744.

The regional center or its designee shall provide to the residential facility administrator all information in its possession concerning any history of dangerous propensity of the consumer prior to the placement in that facility. However, no confidential consumer information shall be released pursuant to this section without the consent of the consumer or authorized representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4745.

During each visit to the facility, the designated staff person shall inform the administrator orally of any substantial inadequacies in the care and services provided, the specific corrective action necessary and the date by which corrective action must be completed. The designated staff person shall confirm this information in writing to the administrator within 48 hours after the oral notice and inform the administrator in writing of the right to appeal the findings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4746.

The severity of the deficiencies and the quality of care provided shall determine how long the regional center or its designee will work with the facility administrator to resolve inadequacies. After a reasonable period of time, if the care continues to be unacceptable, the designated staff person shall submit to his or her supervisor and to the licensing agency and administrator a recommended disposition with supporting documents attached. The placement agency shall develop sufficient documentation of inadequacies and care provided to sustain corrective action.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 470.)
-------------------------------------------

4747.

If a consumer or, when appropriate, the parent, guardian, or conservator or authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, requests a relocation, the regional center shall schedule an individual program plan meeting, as soon as possible to assist in locating and moving to another residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 367, Sec. 18.   (SB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4748.

Within nine months of the effective date of this section, the State Department of Developmental Services shall develop and implement regulations for use by the regional center or its designee to assure uniformity of the care and services to be provided to persons registered with the regional centers who reside in residential facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 470.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Evaluation [4750. - 4754.]

4750.

The Legislature intends that expenditures on state programs for persons with developmental disabilities shall have measurable and desirable results. The results shall reflect the degree to which persons with developmental disabilities are empowered to make choices and are leading more independent, productive, and normal lives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.5.

In order to gather data that is relevant to ensuring the safety and well-being of persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall ensure that the client master file entry for any person with developmental disabilities placed by a regional center will be updated within 30 days after the change of residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

The department shall prepare by July 1, 1978, a plan for using the method to obtain and report statewide information on program effectiveness.

The plan shall include:

(a) A description of any sampling procedures to be used.

(b) Methods for obtaining and analyzing information about the type and amount of service provided to obtain program results.

(c) Methods for determining the state expenditures associated with varying levels of measured program effectiveness.

(d) Specification of procedures and format for future reports to the Legislature on program costs and effectiveness.

(e) The projected costs of implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.

By January 1, 1979, the department shall implement the evaluation system for all programs under its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any agency providing services to persons with developmental disabilities from utilizing additional evaluation mechanisms for the agency’s own program purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Budgetary Process and Financial Provisions [4775. - 4792.]

4775.

The Legislature finds that the method of appropriating funds for numerous programs for the developmentally disabled affects the availability and distribution of services and must be related to statewide planning. Therefore, the process for determining levels of funding of programs must involve consideration of the state plan established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4561) of this division and the participation of citizens who may be directly affected by funding decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 57.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4776.

On or before August 1 of each year, each regional center shall submit to the department and the state council a program budget plan for the subsequent budget year. The budget plan shall include all of the following:

(a) An estimate of all developmentally disabled persons to be served by the regional center.

(b) An estimate of services to be provided by the regional center.

(c) An estimate of cost, by type of service.

(d) Estimated sources and amounts of all revenue, including funds which are not administered by regional centers.

(e) A detailed report of the resources required to implement Section 4509.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1140.)
-------------------------------------------

4776.5.

(a) Regional centers shall not be subject to any provision of law, regulation, or policy required of state agencies pertaining to the planning and acquisition of information technology, including personal computers, local area networks, information technology consultation, and software.

(b) The State Department of Developmental Services and the Association of Regional Center Agencies shall jointly develop guidelines for use by regional centers in the expenditure of funds for those information system activities, including consultation and software development, involving interface with the data bases of the State Department of Developmental Services, including the Uniform Fiscal System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 17.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4777.

On or before September 1 of each year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit to the state council:

(a) An estimate of all developmentally disabled persons to be served throughout the state.

(b) Estimated total cost, by service or educational category.

(c) Estimated sources of revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4778.

To the extent feasible, all funds appropriated for developmental disabilities programs under this part shall be allocated to those programs by August 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 38.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4780.

When appropriated by the Legislature, the department may receive and expend all funds made available by the federal government, the state, its political subdivisions, and other sources, and, within the limitation of the funds made available, shall act as an agent for the transmittal of the funds for services through the regional centers. The department may use any funds received under Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 463.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4780.5.

The State Department of Developmental Services is responsible for the processing, audit, and payment of funds made available to regional centers under this division. The department shall establish procedures for hearing objections to audit findings and exceptions by regional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.

The department may accept and expend grants, gifts, and legacies of money and, with the consent of the Department of Finance, may accept, manage, and expend grants, gifts and legacies of other property, in furtherance of the purposes of this division.

The secretary may enter into agreements with any person, agency, corporation, foundation, or other legal entity to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.5.

(a) For the 2006–07 fiscal year only, a regional center may not expend any purchase of service funds for the startup of any new program unless one of the following criteria is met:

(1) The expenditure is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety or because of other extraordinary circumstances.

(2) The program to be developed promotes and provides integrated supported work options for individuals or groups of no more than three consumers.

(3) The program to be developed promotes and provides integrated social, civic, volunteer, or recreational activities.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a regional center may approve grants for the 2006–07 fiscal year only to current providers to engage in new or expanded employment activities that result in greater integration, conversion from sheltered to supported work environments, self-employment, and increased consumer participation in the federal Ticket to Work program.

(c) Startup contracts for programs funded under this section shall be outcome-based.

(d) The department shall develop criteria by which regional centers shall approve grants, and shall provide prior written authorization for the expenditures under this section.

(e) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) The purchase of services funds allocated as part of the department’s community placement plan process.

(2) Expenditures for the startup of new programs made pursuant to a contract entered into before July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 29.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.6.

(a) A regional center shall not expend any purchase of service funds for the startup of any new program unless the expenditure is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety or because of extraordinary circumstances, and the department has granted prior written authorization for the expenditures.

(b) This section does not apply to the purchase of services funds allocated as part of the department’s community placement plan process pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or the community resource development plan process pursuant to Section
 4418.25.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 16.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4786.

The director shall develop, establish, and maintain an equitable system of rates of state payment for care and services purchased by the department from community care facilities. Such rate system shall be flexible and reflect the differing costs associated with the differing types and levels of care and services provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1285, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

4787.

(a) The department shall, in developing the annual budget for regional center-funded services and supports for residents of developmental centers who are projected to move into the community in the budget year, estimate the costs of these services and supports. Budgeted funding shall be allocated to each regional center based on each regional center’s share of the projected placements to be made within the budget year.

(b) When a resident of a developmental center moves into a community placement outside of their regional catchment area, the department shall transfer from the regional center an appropriate amount of the funding allocated for that consumer to the regional center that will provide services.

(c) A regional center able to exceed its projected placements within the fiscal year shall be allocated additional funding for that purpose in that fiscal year, if sufficient funding is available, and to the extent that additional funding is necessary to make those placements.

(d) If the department determines that a regional center will not make all of the projected placements during the fiscal year for which it has received funding, those funds shall be made available to regional centers who have exceeded their projected placements, to the extent that additional funding is necessary to make those placements.

(e) With the approval of the Department of Finance, savings that result from population reductions in the developmental centers may be transferred to regional centers for the purpose of providing services and supports to residents of developmental centers who have moved into a community placement pursuant to their individual program plan.

(f) This section shall not expand or limit the entitlement to services for a person with developmental disabilities set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 513, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4790.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide an incentive for regional centers to select out-of-home placements that are most appropriate for each person with a developmental disability requiring out-of-home care and to provide a disincentive for inappropriate placement in or delayed discharge from state hospitals.

(b) By March 1, 1982, the Health and Welfare Agency shall submit to the Legislature a detailed implementation plan for a pilot project involving four regional centers. These regional centers shall receive allocations of funds equivalent to the cost of state hospital care for the clients of the individual regional center from which they shall purchase services from state hospitals or other providers.

(c) Funds so allocated shall cover costs of care of all clients of the pilot project regional centers in state hospitals and, in addition, shall be used to pay costs of (1) community care, including but not limited to, out-of-home care for clients currently residing in state hospitals who have been deemed more appropriately served in the community, and (2) out-of-home costs for persons placed after receipt of the allocation.

(d) Regional centers shall be selected on the basis of their willingness to participate in the project, their demonstrated ability to provide necessary community care resources, and their relative standing in the provision of high quality programmatic and administrative services in accordance with the systems evaluation package review of regional centers by the State Department of Developmental Services. In order to ensure the most efficient use of these provisions, one of the four selected regional centers shall have the highest ratio of nonstate hospital out-of-home residential placements in its total active caseload.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 821, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4791.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, from July 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, regional centers may temporarily modify personnel requirements, functions, or qualifications, or staff training requirements for providers, except for licensed or certified residential providers, whose payments are reduced by 1.25 percent pursuant to the amendments to Section 10 of Chapter 13 of the Third Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 2009, as amended by the act amending this section.

(b) A temporary modification pursuant to subdivision (a), effective during any agreed upon period of time from July 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, may only be approved when the regional center determines that the change will not do
 any of the following:

(1) Adversely affect the health and safety of a consumer receiving services or supports from the provider.

(2) Result in a consumer receiving services in a more restrictive environment.

(3) Negatively impact the availability of federal financial participation.

(4) Violate any state licensing or labor laws or other provisions of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations not eligible for modification pursuant to this section.

(c) A temporary modification pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be described in a written services contract between the regional center purchasing the services and the provider, and a copy of the written services contract and any related
 documentation shall be retained by the provider and the regional center purchasing the services from the provider.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the department shall suspend, from July 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, the requirements described in Sections 56732 and 56800 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations requiring community-based day programs and in-home respite agencies to conduct annual reviews and to submit written reports to vendoring regional centers, user regional centers, and the department.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, from July 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, a residential service provider, vendored by a regional center and whose payment is reduced by 1.25 percent pursuant to the amendments to Section 10 of Chapter 13 of the Third Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 2009, as amended by the
 act amending this section, shall not be required to complete quarterly and semiannual progress reports required in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 56026 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. During program review, the provider shall inform the regional center case manager of the consumer’s progress and any barrier to the implementation of the individual program plan for each consumer residing in the residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 16.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4792.

(a) This section of law shall only be operative if subdivision (b) of Section 3.94 of the Budget Act of 2011 is operative. It is the intent of the Legislature for the department to identify up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in General Fund savings from within the overall developmental services system, including any savings or reductions within state administrative support, operation of the developmental centers, and operation of the regional centers, including administration and the purchase of services where applicable if subdivision (b) of Section 3.94 of the Budget Act of 2011 is operative. A variety of strategies, including, but not limited to, savings attributable to caseload adjustments, changes in expenditure trends, unexpended contract funds, or
 other administrative savings or restructuring can be applied to this reduction with the intent of keeping reductions as far away as feasible from consumer’s direct needs, services, and supports, including health, safety, and quality of life.

(b) The department may utilize input from workgroups comprised of consumers and family members, consumer-focused advocacy groups, service provider representatives, regional center representatives, developmental center representatives, other stakeholders, and staff of the Legislature, to develop General Fund savings proposals as necessary.

(c) If subdivision (b) of Section 3.94 of the Budget Act of 2011 is operative, and the department is directed to identify up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in General Fund savings from within the developmental services system, any savings or reductions identified shall be reported to the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the reduction as directed within Section 3.94 of the Budget Act of 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   (SB 73)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Section became operative on December 13, 2011, when condition in subd. (a) was satisfied.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Judicial Review [4800. - 4806.]

4800.

(a) Every adult who is or has been admitted or committed to a state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or any other appropriate placement permitted by law, as a developmentally disabled patient shall have a right to a hearing by writ of habeas corpus for his or her release from the hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility after he or she or any person acting
 on his or her behalf makes a request for release to any member of the staff of the state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility or to any employee of a regional center.

(b) The member of the staff or regional center employee to whom a request for release is made shall promptly provide the person making the request for his or her signature or mark a copy of the form set forth below. The member of the staff, or regional center employee, as the case may be, shall fill in his or her own name and the date, and, if the person signs by mark, shall fill in the person’s name, and shall then deliver the completed copy to the medical director of the state hospital or developmental center, the administrator or director of the community care facility, or the administrator or director of the health facility, as the case may be, or his or her designee, notifying him or her of the request. As soon as possible, the person
 notified shall inform the superior court for the appropriate county, as indicated in Section 4801, of the request for release and shall transmit a copy of the request for release to the person’s parent or conservator together with a statement that notice of judicial proceedings taken pursuant to that request will be forwarded by the court. The copy of the request for release and the notice shall be sent by the person notified by registered or certified mail with proper postage prepaid, addressed to the addressee’s last known address, and with a return receipt requested. The person notified shall also transmit a copy of the request for release and the name and address of the person’s parent or conservator to the court.

(c) Any person who intentionally violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) The form for a request for release shall be substantially as follows:
(Name of the state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility or regional center) ____ day of ____ 19__

I, ____ (member of the staff of the state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility or employee of the regional center), have today received a request for the release from ____ (name of state hospital, developmental center, or community care facility) State Hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility of ____ (name of patient) from the undersigned patient on his or her own behalf or from the undersigned person on behalf of the patient.Signature or mark of patient making request 
for releaseSignature or mark of person making request 
on behalf of patient

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1076, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

(a) Judicial review shall be in the superior court for the county in which the state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility is located, except that, if the adult has been found incompetent to stand trial and has been committed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, judicial review shall be in the superior court of the county that determined the question of the mental competence of the defendant. The adult requesting to be released shall be informed of his or her right to counsel by a member of the staff of the state hospital, developmental center, community care facility, or health facility and by the court; and if he or she does not have an attorney for the proceedings, the court shall immediately appoint the public defender or other
 attorney to assist him or her in the preparation of a petition for the writ of habeas corpus and to represent him or her in the proceedings. The person shall pay the costs of those legal services if he or she is able.

(b) At the time the petition for the writ of habeas corpus is filed with the court, the clerk of the court shall transmit a copy of the petition, together with notification as to the time and place of an evidentiary hearing in the matter, to the parent or conservator of the person seeking release or for whom release is sought and to the director and clients’ rights advocate of the appropriate regional center. Notice shall also be provided to the director of the appropriate developmental center if the person seeking release or for whom release is sought resides in a developmental center. The notice shall be sent by registered
 or certified mail with proper postage prepaid, addressed to the addressee’s last known address, and with a return receipt requested. The clients’ rights advocate of the appropriate regional center may attend any hearing pursuant to this section to assist in protecting the person’s rights.

(c) The court shall either release the adult or order an evidentiary hearing to be held not sooner than five judicial days nor more than 10 judicial days after the petition and notice described in subdivision (b) are deposited in the United States mail pursuant to this section.

(1) If the person seeking release or for whom release is sought resides in a developmental center or institution for mental disease, the regional center director or designee shall submit to the court, the person’s attorney, and all parties required to be noticed pursuant to subdivision (b) a copy of the most recent completed assessment required by subdivision (c) of Section 4418.25, subdivision (e) of Section 4418.7, or paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648. The regional center shall
 submit copies of these assessments within two working days of receiving the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), if the court finds (A) that the adult requesting release or for whom release is requested is not developmentally disabled, or (B) that he or she is developmentally disabled and that he or she is able to provide safely for his or her basic personal needs for food, shelter, and clothing, he or she shall be released within 72 hours. If the court finds that he or she is developmentally disabled and that he or she is unable to provide safely for his or her basic personal needs for food, shelter, or clothing, but that a regional center or a willing responsible person or other public or private agency is able to provide for him or her, the court shall release the developmentally disabled adult to the responsible person, regional center, or other public or private agency, as the case may be, subject to any conditions that the court deems proper for the welfare of the developmentally disabled adult and that are consistent with the purposes of this division.

(3) If the person is charged with a violent felony and has been committed to his or her current placement pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code or Section 6500, and the court finds (A) that the adult requesting release or for whom release is requested is not a person
 with a developmental or intellectual disability, or (B) that he or she is able to provide safely for his or her basic personal needs for food, shelter, and clothing, the court shall, before releasing the person, determine that the release will not pose a danger to the health or safety of others due to the person’s known behavior. If the court finds there is no danger pursuant to the finding required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code, the person shall be released within 72 hours. If the person’s release poses a danger to the health or safety of others, the court may grant or deny the request, taking into account the danger to the health or safety of others posed by the person. If the court finds that release of the person can be made subject to conditions that the court deems proper for the preservation of public health and safety and the welfare of the person, the person shall be released subject to those conditions.

(d) If in a proceeding under this section, the court finds that the adult is developmentally disabled and has no parent or conservator, and is in need of a conservator, the court shall order the appropriate regional center or the state department to initiate, or cause to be initiated, proceedings for the appointment of a conservator for the developmentally disabled adult.

(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 25, Sec. 9.   (AB 89)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

This chapter shall not be construed to impair the right of a conservator of an adult developmentally disabled patient to remove the patient from the state hospital at any time pursuant to Section 4825.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.

(a) If a regional center recommends that a person be admitted to a community care facility or health facility as a developmentally disabled resident, the employee or designee of the regional center responsible for making the recommendations shall certify in writing that neither the person recommended for admission to a community care facility or health facility, nor the parent of a minor or conservator of an adult, if appropriate, nor the person or agency appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, has made an objection to the admission to the person making the recommendation. The regional center shall transmit the certificate, or a copy thereof, to the community care facility or health facility.

(b) A community
 care facility or health facility shall not admit any adult as a developmentally disabled patient on recommendation of a regional center unless a copy of the certificate has been transmitted pursuant to this section.

(c) A person who, knowing that objection to a community care facility or health facility admission has been made, certifies that no objection has been made, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Objections to proposed placements shall be resolved by a fair hearing procedure pursuant to Section 4700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 367, Sec. 19.   (SB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

Whenever a proceeding is held in a superior court under the provisions of this chapter, involving a person who has been placed in a state hospital located outside the county of residence of the person, the provisions of this section shall apply. The appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which the proceeding is held may make out a statement of all of the costs incurred by the county for the investigation, preparation, and conduct of the proceedings, and the costs of appeal, if any. The statement may be certified by a judge of
 the superior court of the county. The statement may then be sent to the county of residence of the person, which shall reimburse the county providing the services. If it is not possible to determine the actual county of residence of the person, the statement may be sent to the county in which the person was originally detained, which shall reimburse the county providing the services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

Objections to proposed transfers between state hospitals shall be resolved pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700).

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 990, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

This chapter shall be construed in a manner that affords the adult requesting release all rights under Section 4502, including the right to treatment and habilitation services and supports in the least restrictive environment, and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), including the right to receive services in the most integrated setting appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 25, Sec. 10.   (AB 89)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Guardianship and Conservatorship [4825. - 4825.]

4825.

The provisions of this division shall not be construed to terminate any appointment of the State Department of Mental Health as guardian of the estate of a developmentally disabled person prior to July 1, 1971.

It is the intent of this section that the Director of Developmental Services be appointed as guardian or conservator of a developmentally disabled person as provided pursuant to the provisions of Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 416) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6000, the admission of an adult developmentally disabled person to a state hospital or private institution shall be upon the application of the person’s parent or conservator in accordance with the provisions of Sections 4653 and 4803. Any person so admitted to a state hospital may leave the state hospital at any time, if such parent or conservator gives notice of his or her desire for the departure of the developmentally disabled person to any member of the hospital staff and completes normal hospitalization departure procedures.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4655, any adult developmentally disabled person who is competent to do so may apply for and receive any services provided by a regional center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 246, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Community Living Continuums [4830. - 4846.]

4830.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Continuum” means a coordinated multicomponent services system within geographic regions of the state whose design shall support the sequential developmental needs of persons so that the pattern of these services provides an unbroken chain of experience, maximum personal growth, and liberty.

(b) “Normalization” means making available programs, methods, and titles that are culturally normative, and patterns and conditions of everyday life that are as close as possible to the norms and patterns of the mainstream of society.

(c) “Designated agency”
 means the legal entity selected by the State Department of Developmental Services to be responsible for organizing or providing services within each continuum or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 58.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4831.

The State Department of Developmental Services may develop the design and phase-in plan for continuums and may designate one or more designated agencies to implement community living continuums throughout the state, after consideration of a recommendation from the State Council on Developmental Disabilities in conjunction with recommendations from the appropriate regional center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 59.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4832.
